Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-292
Claim; requisites; recorded.

The claim referred to in sections 76-290 and 76-291 shall be filed in each county where the claimed real estate, or any part thereof, is located, and must set forth the legal description of the real estate affected by such claim together with a statement of the nature of the claim, charge or interest asserted. The description shall be set forth in particular terms and not by general inclusions.

Laws 1947, c. 243, § 5, p. 764.